California statutes. Education Code
Upon computing in any fiscal year the amount to be deducted from the apportionments to the district from the State School Fund during the succeeding fiscal year, the Controller shall notify the governing board of the district and the county auditor of the county, the county superintendent of which has jurisdiction over the district, of the amount to be deducted.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15742.

The board of supervisors of the county, the county superintendent of which has jurisdiction over any district which under this chapter will have moneys withheld by the Controller from the apportionments to be made to it from the State School Fund during any fiscal year, shall annually at the time the board of supervisors makes the levy of taxes for county purposes, levy a tax upon the property in the district sufficient to raise for the district the amount of money to be withheld by the Controller during the fiscal year in which the tax is levied. The tax, when
 collected, shall be paid into the county treasury of the county, the county superintendent of schools of which has jurisdiction over the district for which the tax was levied, to the credit of the general fund of the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15743.

The board shall prescribe in the detail that it deems necessary, the purposes for which moneys apportioned by it or which it requires the district to contribute toward, or in reduction of the cost of a project, may be expended, and the prescription shall be binding upon the governing board of the district, save as it may be changed or modified by the board for any cause that it sees fit. In determining funds which can be contributed by the district, the board may require the district to contribute unexpended balances of funds earmarked or encumbered by the district
 for furniture, equipment, or any other lawful purpose. However, the changes or substitutions in the purposes for which the funds were earmarked or encumbered, with respect to the requirement under any apportionment heretofore or hereafter made, may be authorized by the board, or pursuant to its delegation, by the Director of General Services.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15744.

Unless the board has received the certificates of the county superintendent of schools required by Section 15722 within nine months from the date of the conditional apportionment, it shall, at the expiration of the nine-month period, void the conditional apportionment and shall certify this fact to the Controller. Each final apportionment made by the board under this chapter shall be certified by it to the Controller who shall from time to time draw his or her warrant on the Treasurer in favor of the county treasurer of the county having jurisdiction over the
 district in accordance with the terms of the final apportionment. The warrant shall be exempt from the provisions of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code and shall be paid by the Treasurer from the Public School Building Loan Fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15745.

A public school building fund is hereby created in the county treasury in each county for each school district in the county. The county treasurer of each county shall pay into the public school building fund of each district, exactly as apportioned by the board, all moneys received by him or her under this chapter with respect to that district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15746.

The governing board of each school district to which an apportionment is made under this chapter is authorized to, and shall, transfer to the public school building fund of the district from all other funds of the district in which the moneys may be, all moneys of the district which under, or pursuant to, this chapter are required to be expended for the project for which the apportionment was made.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15747.

A fund in the State Treasury is hereby created, to be known as the Public School Building Loan Fund. All money in the Public School Building Loan Fund, including any money deposited in the fund from any source whatsoever after July 29, 1949, is hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for expenditure pursuant to apportionments made under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15748.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Allocation Board may from time to time by appropriate resolution order the transfer from the Public School Building Loan Fund to the State School Building Aid Fund of any amounts therein which it deems no longer desirable to retain for the purposes of this chapter and Sections 15900 to 15909, inclusive. Nothing herein shall be deemed to apply to any moneys heretofore or hereafter deposited in the Public School Building Loan Fund by virtue of Sections 15735 and 15907, and former Section 5107 as added by
 Chapter 922 of the Statutes of 1949, and as subsequently amended; or to any moneys appropriated from the Public School Building Loan Fund by virtue of the Budget Acts of 1954 and 1955, and which remain available for expenditure. Upon such order or orders the Controller shall make appropriate transfers, and any sums so transferred shall be available for apportionment in the same manner as other moneys in the State School Building Aid Fund, except that to the amount available for apportionment on the fifth day of each month pursuant to Section 16409, there shall be added any amount transferred to the State School Building Aid Fund by virtue of this paragraph prior to the fifth day of the preceding month. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 15904, after July 7, 1955, there shall be no further transfers to the General Fund from the Public School Building Loan Fund of any amounts deposited therein by virtue of Sections 15752, 15753, and 15754.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15749.

The governing board of each school district to which an apportionment has been made under this chapter shall expend the moneys in the public school building fund of the district exactly as apportioned by the board and only for the purposes for which the moneys were apportioned to the district, and for no other purpose, and shall make the reports relating to the expenditure of the moneys that the board and the Controller shall require.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15751.

It shall be the duty of the Controller to make the audit or audits of the books and records of counties and school districts receiving apportionments under this chapter, as he or she may deem necessary from time to time, for the purpose of determining that the money received by school districts as apportionments hereunder has been expended for the purposes and under the conditions authorized by this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15752.

Whenever the Controller determines that any money apportioned to a school district has been expended by the school district for purposes not authorized by this chapter, or exceeds the final cost of the project which is authorized by this chapter to be paid therefrom, the Controller shall furnish written notice to the board, the governing board of the school district, the county superintendent of schools, the county auditor, and the county treasurer of the county whose county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction over the school district, directing the school
 district and the county treasurer to pay into the State Treasury the amount of the unauthorized expenditures, or the amount of the excess apportionment, as the case may be. Upon receipt of the notice, the governing board shall order the county treasurer to pay to the Treasurer, out of any moneys in the county treasury available to the school district for that purpose, the amount set forth in the notice. That amount shall, upon order of the Controller, be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Public School Building Loan Fund.

It shall be the duty of the governing body and county treasurer to make the payments to the Treasurer as provided in this section, and it shall be the duty of the Controller to enforce the collection on behalf of the state.

If, upon petition of the district, the Controller determines that the amount is in excess of the amount that may be paid out of taxes levied at the maximum rate
 increased by any increase in the rate authorized by the electors of the district pursuant to Section 42202, without impairing essential district services, he or she may provide for the payment of the entire amount or any unpaid balance thereof in not exceeding three consecutive annual payments, commencing with the next school year. Each payment shall be an equal portion of the principal amount, plus accrued interest, and shall be paid not later than January 31st of each school year in which a payment is due. If the district fails to make the payment as specified, the Controller shall deduct the amount thereof from the February payment made to the district under Section 14041.

Deferred payments under this section shall bear interest at the same annual rate of interest as the apportionment from which the unauthorized expenditures or the amounts of excess apportionment were made.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15753.

Any portion of an apportionment paid to a school district under this chapter shall be available for expenditure by its governing board for not less than one year nor more than three years, as the board shall determine, after the date on which the warrant covering the portion of the apportionment was issued by the Controller. For the purposes of this chapter, an apportionment shall be deemed to be expended at the time and to the extent that the amount thereof on deposit in the county treasury has been encumbered by the creation of a valid obligation on the part of the
 school district. Upon the expiration of its period of availability, the unencumbered balance of any apportionment made under this chapter shall become due and payable to the State of California; and the governing board of the school district and the county treasurer shall pay the amount of the unencumbered balance to the Treasurer, out of the funds, and in the manner specified in Section 15752. The payment shall, on order of the Controller, be deposited in the Public School Building Loan Fund in the State Treasury.

It shall be the duty of the governing body and county treasurer to make the payments to the Treasurer as provided in this section, and it shall be the duty of the Controller to enforce the collection on behalf of the state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15754.

Whenever a school district receives an apportionment under this chapter for the purchase or improvement of a school building site and within a period of five years after the date on which the warrant covering the appropriate portion or portions of the apportionment was drawn on the State Treasurer from the Public School Building Loan Fund, (1) sells or otherwise disposes of the site or the improvements thereon, or any portion thereof, purchased or improved in whole or in part from the apportionment, or (2) within not less than one year nor more than five years, as
 the board shall determine, does not begin to use the site or the improvements thereon for the purpose or purposes for which the apportionment was made, the board shall make the determinations and take the action with respect thereto as it may deem necessary. If the board determines that the district has (1) sold or otherwise disposed of the site or the improvements thereon, or any portion thereof, or (2) has not used the site for the purpose for which the apportionment was made, it shall demand the return of the apportionment or the portion thereof that it deems proper.

Written notice of the demand, setting forth the amount due the state pursuant thereto, shall be furnished by the board to the governing board of the school district, the county superintendent of schools, the county auditor, the county treasurer of the county whose county has jurisdiction over the school district, and the Controller. Upon receipt of the notice and demand, the governing board of the
 school district shall order the county treasurer to pay to the Treasurer, out of any moneys in the county treasury available to the school district for that purpose, the amount set forth in the notice. The amount shall, upon order of the Controller, be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Public School Building Loan Fund.

It shall be the duty of the governing board and county treasurer to make the payments to the Treasurer as provided in this section, and it shall be the duty of the Controller to enforce the collection on behalf of the state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. School Housing Aid for Reorganized Districts [15780. - 15795.]

15780.

(a) As used in this article:

(1) “State-aided district” means a district to which a conditional or final apportionment has been made under this chapter.

(2) “Acquiring district” means a district in which all, or a part of, a state-aided district or an applicant district has been included.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in Section 15788, the effective date for the purposes of this article of any change of boundaries or annexation or other inclusion affecting a school district shall be the date the action became effective for the purposes of Section 4002.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15781.

When a district has received conditional apportionments which have become final under this chapter, and there is a unification of the district prior to December 31, 1952, within the meaning of Section 4320, with another district having the same boundaries, the effective date of the unification for the purpose of the first district receiving additional apportionments pursuant to the terms of Section 15714 shall be July 1, 1953.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15782.

Whenever, prior to the date on which a conditional apportionment is made by the board to an applicant district, (1) if an applicant district is annexed to or otherwise included in whole in another district which is ineligible for an apportionment under this chapter, no apportionment shall be made to the applicant district; (2) if less than the whole of an applicant district is included in a district which is ineligible for an apportionment under this chapter, the board may reconsider the application of the applicant district and make the determinations and take the action with respect thereto, including the making, subject to Article 1 of this chapter, of a conditional apportionment to the district, as the board may deem necessary because of the inclusion of less than the whole of the applicant district in the acquiring district; (3) if an applicant district is annexed to or otherwise included in whole or in part in a district which is eligible for an apportionment under this chapter and has made or does make an application for the apportionment, the board may reconsider the applications of the applicant district and the acquiring district and make such determinations and take such action with respect thereto, including the making, subject to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 15700) of this chapter, of conditional apportionments to districts, that the board may deem necessary because of the annexation or other inclusion in the acquiring district of the applicant district in whole or in part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15783.

Whenever, subsequent to the date on which a conditional apportionment is made by the board to an applicant district, but prior to the date on which the conditional apportionment becomes final, (1) if an applicant district is annexed to or otherwise included in whole in a district which is not eligible for an apportionment under this chapter, the conditional apportionment shall, notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, become void and the board shall promptly notify the Controller in writing thereof and the date on which the apportionment became void; (2) if the district to which an applicant district is annexed or in which it is otherwise included in whole is eligible for an apportionment, has made or does make an application for an apportionment under this chapter, the conditional apportionment made to the applicant district shall, notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, become void but the board may reconsider the application of the acquiring district and make determinations and take action with respect thereto, including the making, subject to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 15700) of this chapter except as hereinafter provided, of additional conditional apportionments to the acquiring district, as the board may deem necessary as a result of the annexation or other inclusion in the acquiring district of the applicant district; (3) if less than the whole of an applicant district is included in another district, the conditional apportionment shall, notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter become void, but the board may reconsider the application and make such determinations and take such actions with respect thereto, including the making, subject to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 15700) of this chapter except as hereinafter provided, of new conditional apportionments to the applicant district, as the board may deem necessary as a result of such inclusion of a portion of the applicant district in the acquiring district.

Notwithstanding anything in the first sentence of Section 15721 to the contrary, additional conditional apportionments made to a district under (2), or new conditional apportionments made to a district under (3) of the first paragraph of this section may, with the approval of the board, become final if the total amount of the bonds of the district outstanding and unpaid is within ten thousand dollars ($10,000) of the amount required under Section 15721.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15784.

Whenever, prior to the date on which conditional apportionments have been made to an applicant district for the full amount of state aid approved for the district under Section 15715, (1) if the applicant district is annexed to or otherwise included in whole in another district which is ineligible for an apportionment under this chapter, no further apportionment shall be made to the applicant district; (2) if the applicant district is annexed to or otherwise included in whole in a district which is eligible for an apportionment under this chapter and which has made or does make an application for an apportionment, the board may reconsider the applications of the applicant district and the acquiring district and make determinations and take any action with respect thereto, including the making, subject to Article 1 (commencing with Section 15700) of this chapter, of a conditional apportionment or apportionments to the acquiring district that the board may deem necessary because of such annexation or other inclusion in the acquiring district of the applicant district; (3) if a portion of the applicant district is annexed to or otherwise included in another district, the board may reconsider the application of the applicant district and may, within two years after the first apportionment made under the approval, make additional apportionments that it sees fit to the applicant district, but not in excess of the amount in which the application was originally approved, without requiring the district to issue additional bonds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15785.

Notwithstanding, and in lieu of, any provisions of this chapter to the contrary, excepting Section 15725 if during the fiscal year 1950–1951, or any subsequent fiscal year, a conditional apportionment is or has been made to a district, hereinafter referred to as the original district, and if the original district (1) holds or has held all elections required by Section 15721, and (2) before the apportionment becomes final is or has been annexed to or included in whole in another district, hereinafter referred to as the acquiring district, which had prior thereto received its first final apportionment under this chapter during the same fiscal year, and (3) after the inclusion or annexation sells or has sold the bonds authorized by the aforesaid elections, the board may approve any application by the governing board of the acquiring district and make an apportionment, or apportionments, for any project for which the original district would have been eligible under this chapter had such inclusion not taken place. No apportionment shall be made to the acquiring district under this section unless the proceeds of the bonds which the board required the original district to sell are available for and will be contributed toward the cost of the approved project. Any apportionment made to the acquiring district under this section shall become final when made.

The computations provided in Sections 15729, 15730, and 15733 with respect to apportionments made under this section shall be made exactly as though the acquiring school district was comprised only of the original school district.

Any rate or amount of tax levied pursuant to or under the authority of Sections 14204 and 15742, or any other provision of law, for the purpose of producing the amount or any part thereof deducted by the Controller with respect to apportionments made under this section, during any fiscal year under Sections 15735 and 15738 from apportionments to the acquiring district from the State School Fund shall be levied only on property in the original school district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15786.

Whenever, subsequent to the date when a conditional apportionment is made to a district and before the conditional apportionment becomes final the boundaries of the district are changed so that the territory of the district is reduced by not to exceed 1 percent of the assessed valuation of the district, as determined by the last equalized assessment roll immediately preceding the effective date of the change of boundaries, and the superintendent of schools of the county having jurisdiction over the district has failed to file the certificate required by Section 15795, showing the change of boundaries, and prior to April 15, 1952, the board has certified to the Controller that the apportionment made to the district has become final, the final apportionment is hereby confirmed, ratified, and validated, and any expenditure of money from the Public School Building Loan Fund according to the terms of the final apportionment is hereby confirmed, ratified, and validated.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15787.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, whenever a conditional apportionment has been made to an elementary school district pursuant to Section 15714 prior to August 1, 1951, and the school district has subsequently voted to become a part of a union school district before the school district has voted to accept and repay an amount sufficient to include both said entire apportionment made pursuant to Section 15714, and all other apportionments made to the school district by the board prior to August 1, 1951, the elementary school district is continued in existence until September 1, 1953, for the purpose of (1) receiving any apportionment made to said district subsequent to August 1, 1951, under Section 15718, as if the elementary district had not voted to unionize with another school district, and (2) for the purpose of voting upon the acceptance and repayment of the apportionment mentioned in (1) or any other apportionment made to the district by the board subsequent to August 1, 1951.

If any elementary school district so described above shall vote, prior to September 1, 1953, to accept and repay any apportionment above mentioned (except of any apportionment made under Section 15718), the apportionment shall thereupon become final. Repayment of any apportionment referred to in this section shall be made by the elementary district pursuant to the applicable provisions of this chapter as if no change in boundaries had been made in the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15788.

Whenever, subsequent to the date on which a conditional apportionment made to a district becomes final, the state-aided district is included in whole in another district, the acquiring district shall, on the effective date of the inclusion, succeed to and be vested with all of the duties, powers, purposes, jurisdiction, and responsibilities of the state-aided district with respect to the apportionment and the property acquired or to be acquired from funds provided thereby, and all funds in the public school building fund of the state-aided district shall be transferred to the public school building fund of the acquiring district. All amounts which would, after the effective date of the inclusion, have been otherwise paid to the state-aided district under the terms of or pursuant to the apportionment, shall be paid to the acquiring district. In addition, the acquiring district shall, on the effective date of the inclusion of the state-aided district in the acquiring district as fixed by Section 4000, become liable for the annual repayments and other payments due the state under this chapter with respect to the apportionment or the property acquired or to be acquired therewith.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15789.

Whenever one or more state-aided districts are included in whole in an acquiring district, and the acquiring district applies for and receives an apportionment, then after the effective date of the inclusion and upon the approval of the application of the acquiring district, the governing board of each component state-aided district shall immediately transfer to the acquiring district all moneys of the component district which are required to be, or have been, earmarked for a project or projects of the district. The acquiring district, upon the transfer to it of the funds, may expend the funds for any projects of the acquiring district as to which its application was approved.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15790.

Whenever, subsequent to the date on which a conditional apportionment made to a state-aided district becomes final, less than all of such district is included in another district, the Director of General Services shall determine what portion of the apportionment was expended or will be expended for property acquired or to be acquired by the acquiring district. Any determination made by the Director of General Services under this section may be redetermined by him or her, from time to time, until the project for which the apportionment was made has been completed, and the final cost thereof determined and the final determination has been made pursuant to the final cost. The Director of General Services shall promptly notify the Controller, the governing board of the state-aided district and of the acquiring district, the superintendent of schools, the auditor, and the treasurer of the counties having jurisdiction over said districts of each determination and redetermination made by him or her under this section. No redetermination shall be retroactive nor affect the liability of any school district for any payment or annual repayment, or portion thereof, previously made by or on behalf of such district to the state under the provisions of this chapter.

On and after the date of the change of boundaries, the acquiring district succeeds to and is vested with all of the duties, powers, purposes, jurisdiction, and responsibilities of the state-aided district with respect to that portion of the apportionment which the Director of General Services has determined or redetermined under this section was expended, or will be expended, for property acquired or to be acquired by the acquiring district, and the unexpended part of the portion of the apportionment in the public school building fund of the state-aided district shall be transferred to the public school building fund of the acquiring district. In addition, and at the same time, the acquiring district shall become liable for the payment to the state of that portion of the annual repayment and all other payments due the state under the provisions of this chapter with respect to that portion of the apportionment which the Director of General Services has determined or redetermined was expended, or will be expended for property acquired, or to be acquired by the acquiring district, or, in the event a portion of the apportionment is a lower percentage of the apportionment than the percentage that the assessed valuation in the territory of the state-aided district which was transferred to the acquiring district is of the total assessed valuation of the state-aided district immediately preceding the effective date of the transfer, the acquiring district shall become liable for the payment to the state of that percentage of the annual repayment and all other repayments due to the state under provisions of this chapter with respect to the apportionment which is equal to the percentage of assessed valuation in the territory transferred to the acquiring district.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the liability of the acquiring district for the repayment of any portion of the apportionment made to the state-aided district shall not exceed the product of the highest percentage referred to above (whether relating to assessed valuation or to the portion of the apportionment expended in the property acquired), multiplied by the balance due on the apportionment made to the state-aided district at the time of the withdrawal on the effective date specified in Section 4064 of the territory referred to. The limited liability is hereinafter referred to as “the maximum.” It is the intent of the Legislature that the maximum shall be applied by the Controller, both retroactively and prospectively, provided that as a result of the application (1) no cash refund shall be made to any district; (2) in the event any district has, in the past, paid an amount greater than the maximum, assuming this paragraph had been in effect at that time, the excess shall be credited by the Controller against any apportionment balances for which said district is or may hereafter become liable; and (3) the Controller shall make retroactively any adjustments in the amounts due from other districts by virtue of any adjustments made under (2) above. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any computations required to be made pursuant to this paragraph shall not be reflected in any changes in deductions required to be made pursuant to Section 15735 prior to January 1, 1966.

If any subsection, clause, sentence of phrase of this section is for any reason held to be unconstitutional such decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this section. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have adopted this section, and each subsection, sentence, clause or phrase thereof irrespective of the fact that any one or more subsections, clauses, sentences or phrases be declared unconstitutional.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15791.

Notwithstanding any change in the boundaries of a state-aided district or the annexation to, or the inclusion in, another district of a state-aided district, the state-aided district as it existed immediately prior to the effective date of the action shall be continued in existence for the determination of the assessed valuation of the property therein and for the purposes of the computations provided by Sections 15729, 15730, and 15733; and all the computations required to be made pursuant to those sections shall be made exactly as if there had been no change of boundaries, annexations, or inclusion, except as otherwise provided in Sections 15792 and 15793.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15792.

Whenever, subsequent to the date on which a conditional apportionment becomes final, territory is withdrawn from a state-aided district and no portion of the apportionment was expended for school property acquired by the acquiring district:

(1) If the acquiring district is a state-aided district, the assessed valuation in the territory acquired shall be included in determining assessed valuation of the property in the acquiring district, and shall thereafter be excluded in determining assessed valuation of the property in the state-aided district, for purposes of the computations under Sections 15729 to 15733, inclusive;

(2) If the acquiring district is not a state-aided district, the State Controller shall determine the percentage relationship, at the time of the withdrawal, between (a) the assessed valuation in the territory acquired, together with the current assessed valuation in all other territory theretofore acquired by the acquiring district from the state-aided district since the date of its first conditional apportionment under this chapter, and (b) the current assessed valuation of the state-aided district as it was territorially constituted on the latter date.

If the percentage of assessed valuation in acquired territory is, in the aggregate, less than 10 percent, the assessed valuation in all the acquired territory shall be excluded, until the next withdrawal of territory from the state-aided district to the acquiring district, in determining the assessed valuation of the state-aided district for the purposes of the computations under Sections 15729 to 15733, inclusive.

If the percentage of assessed valuation in acquired territory is, in the aggregate, a percentage equal to or greater than 10 percent, the Controller shall, by deducting such percentage from 100 percent, obtain the “complement percentage.” Until the next withdrawal of territory from the state-aided district to the acquiring district, the assessed valuation of the state-aided district for purposes of the computations under Sections 15729 to 15733, inclusive, shall be determined by dividing the current assessed valuation of the state-aided district, as territorially constituted immediately subsequent to the last withdrawal, by the complement percentage.

Whenever, pursuant to this section, the assessed valuation of the state-aided district is adjusted for repayment computation purposes by use of the complement percentage, liability for the annual repayment computed shall be apportioned between the state-aided district and the acquiring district by multiplying such annual repayment by the complement percentage, the product representing the liability of the state-aided district, and the remainder of the computed repayment representing the liability of the acquiring district.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the liability of the state-aided district shall not exceed the product of any “complement percentage” (as it may from time to time exist) times the balance due on the final apportionment at the time the complement percentage is established; and the liability of the acquiring district (while a complement percentage remains unchanged) shall not exceed the remainder of the balance of the aforesaid final apportionment at the time the complement percentage is established. The maximum liability on the part of either the state-aided or acquiring districts established as above (and until the time that the liability be altered by altering the “complement percentage”) shall be hereinafter referred to in this section with respect to each district as “the maximum.”
